incubator/apertium-ru-cu/apertium-ru-cu.cu.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="du"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- сынъ; сын -->
    <pardef n="сын/ъ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оу</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ови</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъ</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оу</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оу</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>омь</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъ</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>овоу</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъма</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>овоу</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъ</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъмъ</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъхъ</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъми</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ове</l>
          <r>ъ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- свекры; свекр -->
    <pardef n="свекр/ы__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъве</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъви</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвь</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъве</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвиѭ</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвоу</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвама</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъви</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвоу</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъви</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвъ</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвамъ</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъви</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвахъ</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъвами</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ъви</l>
          <r>ы<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- слоуга; слоу -->
    <pardef n="слоу/га__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гы</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ѕѣ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гѫ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ѕѣ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>го</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гоѭ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>га</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гоу</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гама</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ѕѣ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гоу</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гама</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ѕѣ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гъ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гамъ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гы</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гахъ</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гами</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>гы</l>
          <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="сынъ"><i>сын</i><par n="сын/ъ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="свекры"><i>свекр</i><par n="свекр/ы__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="слоуга"><i>слоу</i><par n="слоу/га__n_m"/></e>
